Maryland, session 2025, HB0525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
16–201.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0525*

HOUSE BILL 525
(a) (1) In this section[, “influence”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “FRAUD” INCLUDES THE USE OF SYNTHETIC MEDIA.
(3) “INFLUENCE” includes the use of pressure, deception, trickery, or
direct or indirect authority to induce action or to change the decision or act of another,
regardless of the medium used.
(4) “SYNTHETIC MEDIA” MEANS AN IMAGE, AN AUDIO RECORDING, OR
A VIDEO RECORDING THAT HAS BEEN INTENTIONALLY CREATED OR MANIPULATED
WITH THE USE OF GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE OR OTHER DIGITAL
TECHNOLOGY TO CREATE A REALISTIC BUT FALSE IMAGE, AUDIO RECORDING, OR
VIDEO RECORDING:
(I) PURPORTING TO DEPICT A REAL, CLEARLY IDENTIFIED
CANDIDATE OR THE SPEECH OR CONDUCT OF THE CANDIDATE; OR
(II) PRODUCING A FUNDAMENTALLY DIFFERENT
UNDERSTANDING OR IMPRESSION OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S APPEARANCE, SPEECH, OR
CONDUCT THAN A REASONABLE INDIVIDUAL WOULD HAVE FROM THE UNALTERED,
ORIGINAL VERSION OF THE IMAGE, AUDIO RECORDING, OR VIDEO RECORDING.
(b) A person may not willfully and knowingly:
(1) (i) impersonate another person in order to vote or attempt to vote;
or
(ii) vote or attempt to vote under a false name;
(2) vote more than once for a candidate for the same office or for the same
ballot question;
(3) vote or attempt to vote more than once in the same election, or vote in
more than one election district or precinct;
(4) vote in an election district or precinct without the legal authority to vote
in that election district or precinct;
(5) influence or attempt to influence a voter’s voting decision through the
use of force, FRAUD, threat, menace, intimidation, bribery, reward, or offer of reward;
(6) influence or attempt to influence a voter’s decision, through the use of
force, fraud, threat, menace, intimidation, bribery, reward, or offer of reward, whether to:

HOUSE BILL 525 3
(i) go to the polls to cast a vote; or
(ii) vote by other lawful means; or
(7) engage in conduct that results or has the intent to result in the denial
or abridgement of the right of any citizen of the United States to vote on account of race,
color, or disability.
(c) Except as provided in § 16–1002 of this title, a person who violates this section
is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine of not more than $5,000 or
imprisonment for not more than 5 years or both.
(d) A person who violates this section is subject to § 5–106(b) of the Courts Article.
16–905.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DEEPFAKE” MEANS AN IMAGE, AN AUDIO
RECORDING, OR A VIDEO RECORDING THAT HAS BEEN INTENTIONALLY CREATED OR
MANIPULATED WITH THE USE OF GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE OR
OTHER DIGITAL TECHNOLOGY TO CREATE A REALISTIC BUT FALSE DEPICTION OF A
PERSON THAT AN ORDINARY PERSON WOULD CONCLUDE IS AN ACTUAL VISUAL OR
AUDIO REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON DEPICTED.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A DEEPFAKE THAT IS:
(1) DISSEMINATED BY THE NEWS MEDIA; OR
(2) SATIRE OR PARODY.
(C) A PERSON MAY NOT, WITH FRAUDULENT INTENT, INFLUENCE OR
ATTEMPT TO INFLUENCE A VOTER’S DECISION WHETHER OR NOT TO CAST A VOTE
OR WHETHER TO VOTE FOR OR AGAINST A CANDIDATE OR BALLOT ISSUE BY
DISSEMINATING A DEEPFAKE.
(D) A PERSON ACTS WITH FRAUDULENT INTENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION ONLY IF THE PERSON DISSEMINATES A DEEPFAKE:
(1) THAT MISREPRESENTS A FACT THAT IS MATERIAL TO A VOTER’S
DECISION WHETHER OR NOT TO CAST A VOTE OR WHETHER TO VOTE FOR OR
AGAINST A CANDIDATE OR BALLOT ISSUE;
(2) WITH KNOWLEDGE THAT THE DEEPFAKE IS A DEEPFAKE, OR WITH
RECKLESS DISREGARD FOR WHETHER THE DEEPFAKE IS A DEEPFAKE; AND

HOUSE BILL 525
(3) WITH THE INTENT TO DECEIVE A VOTER AND INDUCE A VOTER TO
CAST A VOTE OR NOT CAST A VOTE OR TO VOTE FOR OR AGAINST A CANDIDATE OR
BALLOT ISSUE AT LEAST IN PART ON THE BASIS OF THE DECEPTION.
(E) THE FOLLOWING PERSONS MAY NOT BE FOUND TO HAVE VIOLATED THIS
SECTION BECAUSE THE PERSON’S SERVICES OR FACILITIES ARE USED BY ANOTHER
PERSON TO DISSEMINATE A DEEPFAKE IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION:
(1) AN INTERACTIVE COMPUTER SERVICE, AS DEFINED IN 47 U.S.C. §
230;
(2) AN INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDER;
(3) A CLOUD SERVICE PROVIDER;
(4) A TELECOMMUNICATIONS NETWORK;
(5) A RADIO OR TELEVISION BROADCASTING STATION OR NETWORK;
(6) A CABLE, SATELLITE RADIO, SATELLITE TELEVISION, OR
STREAMING SERVICE OPERATOR, PROGRAMMER, OR PRODUCER; OR
(7) A NEWSPAPER, MAGAZINE, WEBSITE, OR OTHER PERIODICAL
PUBLICATION.
(F) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE OF NOT MORE THAN $5,000 OR
IMPRISONMENT FOR NOT MORE THAN 5 YEARS OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.